New York, session 2025-2026, A10311.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 31 of the private housing finance law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision 16 to read as follows: 3 16. The commissioner or supervising agency shall develop a procedure 4 whereby a family member of a tenant or cooperator is notified in the 5 case that their application to succeed to a lease or occupancy agreement 6 is denied by a limited-profit housing company subject to the provisions 7 of this article, and such procedure shall also include the appeals proc- 8 ess available to the denied applicant. The notification that shall be 9 sent to the applicant shall be in written form, include reasons for the 10 denial, and the appeals process. Such appeal shall include a hearing 11 held by the commissioner or the supervising agency with the applicant, 12 or their designee, and any interested witnesses to review the housing 13 company's determination and any additional information submitted by the 14 applicant. Any limited-profit housing company may elect additional 15 procedures so long as such procedures are not inconsistent with the 16 procedures developed by the commissioner or supervising agency and any 17 other requirements set forth in this article. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 20 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 21 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 22 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14892-02-6